Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.64.090

Statewide measures—When mandatory—Cost at state expense.

When the official canvass of returns of any election reveals that the difference in the number of votes cast for the approval of a statewide measure and the number of votes cast for the rejection of such measure is less than two thousand votes and also less than one-half of one percent of the total number of votes cast on such measure, the secretary of state shall direct that a recount of all votes cast on such measure be made on such measure, in the manner provided by RCW 29A.64.041 and 29A.64.061, and the cost of such recount will be at state expense.

[ 2023 c 109 s 3; 2016 c 204 s 1; 2013 c 11 s 70; 2003 c 111 s 1609. Prior: 2001 c 225 s 11; 1973 c 82 s 1. Formerly RCW 29.64.080.]

NOTES:

Findings—2023 c 109: See note following RCW 29A.32.070.